District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-619

Penalties for conferral of degrees without licenses.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 586f
Mar. 2, 1929, 45 Stat. 1505, ch. 523
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(1)(H)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 470(a), 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(5), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-619.
1981 Ed., § 29-819.
1973 Ed., § 29-419.